motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
abbruttire/tvTXI
accanire/tvXI
accavigliatore/STqr
accertatrice/STUqrs
acciottolio/nTq
acetilenico/nT
achillea/QTUqrs
aclassista/QRTUqrs
acquafortista/QRTUqrs
acustico/nTYW
adibire/tvI
adogmatico/TYqr
adottante/STUqrs
affastellare/ATXqrI
affienente/Us
affittiscono/Tqr
agamico/nYT
aggettivato/FTUqrs
aggiustatrice/STUqrs
aggruppato/FTUqrs
agostana/QTUqrs
agrotecnico/nTqr
alberghiero/OTqr
alcalde/STUqrs
alea/TUqrs
allettevole/STUqrs
allevato/FTUqrs
alleviato/FTUqrs
alticcia/nTUqrs
altitonante/STUqrs
amarantacea/QTUqrs
ambasciatore/STqr
ammagliatrice/STUqrs
ammidico/Tqr
ammonizione/STUqrs
amniote/STUqs
anamorfosi/Tqr
androgena/QTUqrs
androne/STUqrs
anelastico/Tn
animalesca/QTUqrs
annessionista/QRTUqrs
annumerato/FTUqrs
anticipazione/STUqrs
anticlericale/STUqrs
antimicrobico/Tn
antiossidante/STUqrs
antivipera/TUqrs
antonimico/Tn
antrace/STUqrs
aponevrotico/Tqr
appaiato/FTUqrs
appartengono/Tqr
appressare/ATXqrI
appuntisco/Tqr
ara/QTUqrs
arcaccia/nTUqs
archeologia/QTUqrs
arcidiocesi/Tqr
arlecchinata/QTUqrs
armeggiato/FTUqrs
arpese/STUqrs
arruolamento/OTqr
arsenale/STUqrs
asimmetria/QTUqrs
asinella/QTUqrs
aspecifico/Tqr
associazionismo/OTqr
assordisce/TUqrs
assuefatto/m
astaco/nTq
asticciola/QTUqrs
atattico/nT
atavico/Tqr
atteggiato/FTUqrs
attraccaggio/OTqr
attuazione/STUqrs
aumentato/FTUqrs
autoclave/STUqrs
autoistruzione/STUqrs
autoriale/STUqrs
autoridotta/QTUqrs
avocatoria/QTUqrs
avventuristico/nT
avveramento/OTqr
barbadiano/o
barraggia/n
batteriologico/pY
belluino/oY
bettoliere/u
bibliologo/on
bifido/o
biologo/p
biscazziere/u
bisognoso/o
boccaccia/n
bontempone/u
borsone/u
boxato/o
bracalone/u
brachicatalettico/p
bragia/nQ
buccia/n
buffonesco/oY
buontempone/u
calzatoio/o
camaleontico/p
cancelliere/u
capoccia/n
capro/o
carpire/tvI
casareccia/n
casermistico/p
casto/oYW
cerbiatto/o
cerusico/p
cesio/n
chiesto/mJ
cincia/n
cionco/o
circoscritto/m
citofonico/p
collaborativo/o
combattentistico/p
composto/mJYW
comunicativo/o
concluso/m
connesso/mJ
contagioso/oY
contraffatto/m
coperto/mJY
correo/o
cosparso/m
cosuccia/n
creazionistico/p
criogeno/o
custodire/tvI
decomposto/m
demonologico/p
deposto/m
desioso/o
detratto/m
diastolico/p
digerire/tvI
dimesso/mY
disceso/mJ
discusso/mJ
disperso/m
dissenterico/p
disteso/mY
distratto/mYW
distributivo/oY
disunire/tvI
ebanite/STUqrs
ecbolico/Tqr
ecclesiale/STUqrs
eiaculatorio/Tqr
Einaudi/Tqr
elettromotrice/STUqs
ellittica/QRTUqrs
ematemesi/TUqrs
empiristico/nYT
encefalitica/QRTUqrs
endoscopico/Tqr
ennesima/QTUqrs
epatalgia/QTUqrs
epidemico/nYT
epimitio/Tqr
eritropsia/TUqrs
erniario/OTqr
esametilendiammina/TUqrs
esibire/tvTXqrI
esibizionistico/Tqr
esperibilità/TUqs
esposto/mT
estetologia/TUqrs
estorto/OTqr
eudemonica/QRTUqrs
eufonico/nTY
euforia/QTUqrs
famelico/p
fatalone/u
femminino/o
fiduccia/n
filantropico/pY
finanziere/u
fiorire/tvI
floscia/n
fluoridrico/p
fotolitografico/p
fradicio/o
frapposto/m
gaggia/nQ
galliambico/p
gelivo/o
geofisico/p
girostatico/p
gonzo/o
graffire/tvI
grammatologico/pY
grascia/n
icastica/QRTUqrs
idatidea/QTUqrs
idrofobica/QRTUqrs
idrotimetro/OTqr
imbaldanzire/tvTXqrI
imbarcatoio/OTqr
imbianchire/tvTXqrI
imbozzacchire/tvTXI
imbozzimare/ATXqrI
imbrattante/Us
immelanconire/tvTXqrI
impantanato/FTUqrs
impaurire/tvTXqrI
imperare/ATXqrI
imperforazione/STUqrs
impietosire/tvTXqrI
imporporare/ATXqrI
imputridire/tvTXqrI
inabitata/QTUqrs
inasprire/tvTXqrI
incagliamento/Tqr
incalcinato/FTUqrs
inceronato/FTUqrs
inciampicare/ATXqrI
incivilire/tvTXqrI
inconscia/nTUqrs
incostituzionalità/TUqs
indecorosa/QTUqrs
indemaniato/FTUqrs
indispettire/tvTXqrI
indisposto/mT
infeltrire/tvTXqrI
infirmato/FTqr
infittente/Us
infittire/tvTXqrI
ingagliardire/tvTXqrI
inghiottonito/HTUqrs
ingoffire/tvTXqrI
inintelligibilità/TUqs
innervosire/tvTXqrI
inorganica/QRTUqrs
inserire/tvTXqrI
insulsa/QTUqrs
intedescato/FTUqrs
intenerire/tvTXqrI
interfertile/STUqrs
interposta/QTUqrs
intorbidire/tvTXqrI
intrinsecare/ATXqrI
introdotto/mT
inutilizzato/FTUqrs
invacchente/Us
invaghire/tvTXqrI
involgarire/tvI
ipoalimentazione/STUqrs
ipometria/TUqrs
ipostatizzazione/STUqs
irruvidente/Us
israelitica/QRTUqrs
isterilire/tvI
istesso/Tqr
ladro/oY
lattificcia/n
lemanico/p
linaiolo/o
liturgico/pY
magnesiaco/p
malagheno/o
malconcia/n
massiccia/n
massonico/p
masticatorio/o
meroblastico/p
metalogico/p
microbico/p
minuzioso/oYW
miotonico/p
moralistico/pY
morso/mJ
motolancia/n
muggire/tvI
multilobo/o
nebulone/u
neolitico/p
nigeriano/o
nonilico/p
obiettrice/STUqrs
oftalmometria/TUqrs
olfattometro/OTqr
olinda/QTUqrs
oncia/nTUqrs
oncologo/Tqr
onoratezza/QTUqrs
ooplasma/RTqr
opposto/mYT
orinatoio/OTqr
Ornella/TUqrs
ortogenesi/Tqr
ostruzionismo/OTqr
otalgica/QRTUqrs
panarabo/o
parabolico/p
parolaccia/n
pedologo/p
pelatino/o
perire/tvI
peschereccia/n
picconiere/u
pico/o
pirotecnico/p
poliglottico/p
pollo/o
porcareccia/n
posposto/m
predinastico/p
preposto/m
prescritto/o
prestabilire/tvI
preteso/m
promosso/m
protetto/mW
protonico/p
provincia/nQ
pugnato/o
qualunquistico/pY
rabbrividire/tvI
radiodiffuso/m
rancia/n
rattrappire/tvI
ravvolto/m
reatino/o
reintrodotto/m
requisire/tvI
respinto/m
riaccolto/m
riassunto/m
ricinoleico/p
ridistribuire/tvI
rieletto/m
rievocativo/o
rifranto/m
rimpicciolire/tvI
rincorso/m
rincupire/tvI
ringiallire/tvI
rintorbidire/tvI
rischiarire/tvI
rispostaccia/n
rugoso/o
salsiccia/n
sbalordire/tvI
scarnire/tvI
scatolaio/o
sceso/m
schizofrenico/p
sconvolto/mW
selvaggia/n
semicoperto/m
semivivo/o
seppellire/tvI
sgranchire/tvI
sifilitico/p
sivigliano/o
smesso/m
sociologico/pY
soppresso/m
sospeso/m
sottrattivo/o
sovraesposto/m
squadraccia/n
stannico/p
statuire/tvI
stinto/m
stizzoso/oY
suesposto/m
superfluo/oY
tabico/p
tendinoso/o
teocentrico/p
termobilancia/n
tiobarbiturico/p
toscano/o
trascritto/m
trimetrico/p
tuboloso/o
ubbidienza/QTUqrs
uggia/nTUqrs
ultimato/FTUqrs
umbertino/OTqr
uruguaiana/QTUqrs
usuraia/QTUqrs
verdiccia/n
vergello/o
vinto/m
vocalico/p
volpaccia/n
votivo/o
